Utah statutes.
75-2-405.   Source, determination, and documentation.
(1)  If the estate is otherwise sufficient, property specifically devised may
not be used to satisfy rights to homestead allowance or exempt property.
Subject to this restriction, the surviving spouse, guardians of minor
children, or children who are adults may select property of the estate as
homestead allowance and exempt property.  The personal representative may make
those selections if the surviving spouse, the children, or the guardians of
the minor children are unable or fail to do so within a reasonable time or
there is no guardian of a minor child.  The personal representative may
execute an instrument or deed of distribution to establish the ownership of
property taken as homestead allowance or exempt property.  The personal
representative may determine the family allowance in a lump sum not exceeding
$18,000 or periodic installments not exceeding $1,500 per month for one year,
and may disburse funds of the estate in payment of the family allowance and
any part of the homestead allowance payable in cash.  The personal
representative or an interested person aggrieved by any selection,
determination, payment, proposed payment, or failure to act under this section
may petition the court for appropriate relief, which may include a family
allowance other than that which the personal representative determined or
could have determined.
(2)  If the right to an elective share is exercised on behalf of a surviving
spouse who is an incapacitated person, the personal representative may add any
unexpended portions payable under the homestead allowance, exempt property,
and family allowance to the trust established under Subsection 75-2-212(2).
